Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 4
PROPERTY, SALES, BORROWING,
AND SIGNATURE GUARANTY

11-105-401. Acquisition of property to satisfy indebtedness.

A state bank may take property of any kind to satisfy, in whole or in part, or to protect indebtedness previously created in good faith by it. Property acquired by a state bank to apply on an indebtedness to a state bank shall be held subject to the following limitations:

Stock shall be sold within six months or such additional period not exceeding eighteen months as the banking board may allow.

Real estate may be used in the banking business, subject to the conditions prescribed by this code for property purchased for such use, or may be rented. Real estate may be put in such condition as will reasonably facilitate its sale. Unless used in the banking business, it shall be sold within fifteen years or such longer period as the banking board may allow.

Other property, the acquisition of which is not otherwise authorized by this code, shall be sold within two years or such longer period as the banking board may allow.

The property shall be entered on the books at not more than cost or fair market value, whichever is less, except as otherwise provided by the banking board. Each bank maintaining property acquired to satisfy indebtedness will obtain an initial written appraisal and subsequent appraisals as to fair market value by a qualified independent appraiser or such other person as the banking board may approve. The subsequent appraisals shall be obtained pursuant to rules of the state banking board; except that, for purposes of this subsection (1)(d), an appraisal, as defined in section 12-10-602 (1), by an appraiser certified or licensed pursuant to section 12-10-611 shall not be required on properties initially valued pursuant to this subsection (1)(d) at a value consistent with federal requirements and established pursuant to rules of the state banking board. If the appraiser or other person approved by the banking board certifies in writing the appraiser's or other person's opinion that the fair market value has not declined, this opinion may be substituted for a subsequent appraisal.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1124, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(d) amended, p. 323, § 6, effective April 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 14-117), ch. 385, p. 1917, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1660, § 64, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 21-1293), ch. 413, p. 2756, § 1, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-8-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-402. Banking property - acquisition.

A state bank may invest in fixed assets of the bank or the stock or obligations of any corporation holding such fixed assets or may make loans to or upon the security of the stock of any such corporation, but the aggregate of all such investments and loans shall not exceed one hundred percent of the bank's capital, as provided in the rules promulgated by the banking board; except that the banking board may approve a larger investment upon application of the bank if the banking board deems the same prudent. As used in this subsection (1), "fixed assets" means real estate, leasehold improvements, fixtures, furniture, and equipment; "real estate" and "leasehold improvements" include land and buildings to be used in the transaction of the bank's business and any excess space that may be rented to others.

The rate of depreciation of property so acquired may be prescribed by the banking board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1125, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-8-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-403. Sale of assets.

A bank chartered in this or another state may sell any asset in the ordinary course of business or, with the approval of the banking board, in any other circumstance. The sale of all, or substantially all, of the assets of a bank or of a department thereof is governed by section 11-103-709.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1125, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1466, § 13, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-8-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-404. Pledge of assets.

A state bank may pledge its assets to:

Enable it to act as agent for the sale of obligations of the United States;

Secure borrowed funds;

Secure deposits if:

The depositor is required to obtain such security by the laws of the United States, by the terms of any interstate compact, by the laws of any state, or by the order of a court of competent jurisdiction; or

The state bank secures the deposit with a letter of credit issued or confirmed by a federal home loan bank; or

Otherwise comply with the provisions of this code.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1125, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 09-1053), ch. 159, p. 689, § 7, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-8-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-405. Signature guaranty.

A bank may become guarantor of the genuineness of a signature.

A bank guaranteeing the signature of a person on any document warrants to any person relying on such guaranty only that:

The signature is that of a person signing;

The signer is the holder, or the signer has purported authority to sign in the name of the holder; except that, if the holder purports to act as a fiduciary, as "fiduciary" is defined either in this code or in article 1 of title 15, C.R.S., or if the holder's name is signed by a person purporting to act on the holder's behalf as such a fiduciary, the bank warrants that such holder or such person so signing as such fiduciary is in fact the fiduciary he or she purports to be and warrants that the bank has no actual knowledge that such fiduciary is committing a breach of such fiduciary's obligation as such fiduciary in signing such document and that it has no knowledge of such facts that its action in guaranteeing the signature amounts to bad faith; and

The signer has legal capacity to sign.

A bank may disclaim in its guaranty all or any part of the obligations set forth in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1125, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-8-106 as it existed prior to 2003.